Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 2 Rights of Custodians or Users

53-13-10.
User’s direction on disclosures.

A user may use an online tool to direct the custodian to disclose to a designated recipient or not to disclose some or all of the user’s digital assets, including the content of electronic communications. If the online tool allows the user to modify or delete a direction at all times, a direction regarding disclosure using an online tool shall override a contrary direction by the user in a will, trust, power of attorney, or other record.

If a user has not used an online tool to give direction under subsection (a) of this Code section or if the custodian has not provided an online tool, the user may allow or prohibit in a will, trust, power of attorney, or other record disclosure to a fiduciary of some or all of the user’s digital assets, including the content of electronic communications sent or received by the user.

A user’s direction under subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section shall override a contrary provision in a terms-of-service agreement that does not require the user to act affirmatively and distinctly from the user’s assent to the terms of service.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-13-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 1089, § 1/SB 301.

53-13-11.
Modification to existing rights.

This chapter shall not change or impair a right of a custodian or a user under a terms-of-service agreement to access and use digital assets of the user.

This chapter shall not give a fiduciary or designated recipient any new or expanded rights other than those held by the user for whom, or for whose estate, the fiduciary or designated recipient acts or represents.

A fiduciary’s or designated recipient’s access to digital assets may be modified or eliminated by a user, by federal law, or by a terms-of-service agreement if the user has not provided direction under Code Section 53-13-10.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-13-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 1089, § 1/SB 301.

53-13-12.
Custodian rights; administrative charges; disclosure of deleted assets; court order.

When disclosing digital assets of a user under this chapter, the custodian may at its sole discretion:

Grant a fiduciary or designated recipient full access to the user’s account;

Grant a fiduciary or designated recipient partial access to the user’s account sufficient to perform the tasks with which the fiduciary or designated recipient is charged; or

Provide a fiduciary or designated recipient a copy in a record of any digital asset that, on the date the custodian received the request for disclosure, the user could have accessed if the user were alive and had full capacity and access to the account.

A custodian may assess a reasonable administrative charge for the cost of disclosing digital assets under this chapter.

A custodian need not disclose under this chapter a digital asset deleted by a user.

If a user directs or a fiduciary requests a custodian to disclose under this chapter some, but not all, of the user’s digital assets, the custodian need not disclose the assets if segregation of the assets would impose an undue burden on the custodian. If the custodian believes the direction or request imposes an undue burden, the custodian or fiduciary may seek an order from the court to disclose:

A subset limited by date of the user’s digital assets;

All of the user’s digital assets to the fiduciary or designated recipient;

None of the user’s digital assets; or

All of the user’s digital assets to the court for review in camera.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-13-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 1089, § 1/SB 301.

53-13-13.
Deceased giving consent or court order for disclosure by custodian to personal representative.

If a deceased user consented or a court directs disclosure of the contents of electronic communications of the user, the custodian shall disclose to the personal representative of the estate of the user the content of an electronic communication sent or received by the user if the personal representative gives the custodian:

A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form;

A certified copy of the death certificate of the user;

A certified copy of the letters testamentary, letters of administration, or other letters of appointment of the personal representative;

Unless the user provided direction using an online tool, a copy of the user’s will, trust, power of attorney, or other record evidencing the user’s consent to disclosure of the content of electronic communications; and

If requested by the custodian:

A number, username, address, or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the user’s account;

Evidence linking the account to the user; or

A finding by the court that:

The user had a specific account with the custodian, identifiable by the information specified in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;

Disclosure of the content of electronic communications of the user would not violate 18 U.S.C. Section 2701, in effect on January 1, 2018; 47 U.S.C. Section 222, in effect on January 1, 2018; or other applicable law;

Unless the user provided direction using an online tool, the user consented to disclosure of the content of electronic communications; or

Disclosure of the content of electronic communications of the user is reasonably necessary for administration of the estate.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-13-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 1089, § 1/SB 301.

53-13-14.
Custodian’s disclosure of catalogue of electronic communications; circumstances.

Unless the user prohibited disclosure of digital assets or the court directs otherwise, a custodian shall disclose to the personal representative of the estate of a deceased user a catalogue of electronic communications sent or received by the user and digital assets, other than the content of electronic communications, of the user, if the personal representative gives the custodian:

A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form;

A certified copy of the death certificate of the user;

A certified copy of the letters testamentary, letters of administration, or other letters of appointment of the personal representative; and

If requested by the custodian:

A number, username, address, or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the user’s account;

Evidence linking the account to the user;

An affidavit stating that disclosure of the user’s digital assets is reasonably necessary for administration of the estate; or

A finding by the court that:

The user had a specific account with the custodian, identifiable by the information specified in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph; or

Disclosure of the user’s digital assets is reasonably necessary for administration of the estate.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-13-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 1089, § 1/SB 301.

53-13-15.
Custodian’s disclosure under power of attorney.

To the extent a power of attorney expressly grants an agent authority over the content of electronic communications sent or received by the principal and unless directed otherwise by the principal or the court, a custodian shall disclose to the agent the content if the agent gives the custodian:

A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form;

An original or copy of the power of attorney expressly granting the agent authority over the content of electronic communications of the principal;

A certification by the agent, under penalty of perjury, that the power of attorney is in effect; and

If requested by the custodian:

A number, username, address, or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the principal’s account; or

Evidence linking the account to the principal.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-13-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 1089, § 1/SB 301.

53-13-16.
Disclosures by custodians to agents.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court, directed by the principal, or provided by a power of attorney, a custodian shall disclose to an agent with specific authority over digital assets or general authority to act on behalf of a principal a catalogue of electronic communications sent or received by the principal and digital assets, other than the content of electronic communications, of the principal if the agent gives the custodian:

A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form;

An original or a copy of the power of attorney that gives the agent specific authority over digital assets or general authority to act on behalf of the principal;

A certification by the agent, under penalty of perjury, that the power of attorney is in effect; and

If requested by the custodian:

A number, username, address, or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the principal’s account; or

Evidence linking the account to the principal.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-13-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 1089, § 1/SB 301.

53-13-17.
Disclosure by custodians to trustees.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court or provided in a trust, a custodian shall disclose to a trustee that is an original user of an account any digital asset of the account held in trust, including a catalogue of electronic communications of the trustee and the content of electronic communications.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-13-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 1089, § 1/SB 301.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 275 (2018).

53-13-18.
Trustee’s requirements for disclosure by custodian.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court, directed by the user, or provided in a trust, a custodian shall disclose to a trustee that is not an original user of an account the content of an electronic communication sent or received by an original or successor user and carried, maintained, processed, received, or stored by the custodian in the account of the trust if the trustee gives the custodian:

A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form;

A certified copy of the trust instrument or a certification of the trust under Code Section 53-12-280 that includes consent to disclosure of the content of electronic communications to the trustee;

A certification by the trustee, under penalty of perjury, that the trust exists and the trustee is a currently acting trustee of the trust; and

If requested by the custodian:

A number, username, address, or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the trust’s account; or

Evidence linking the account to the trust.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-13-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 1089, § 1/SB 301.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 275 (2018).

53-13-19.
Disclosure to trustee of electronic communications.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court, directed by the user, or provided in a trust, a custodian shall disclose to a trustee that is not an original user of an account a catalogue of electronic communications sent or received by an original or successor user and stored, carried, or maintained by the custodian in an account of the trust and any digital assets, other than the content of electronic communications, in which the trust has a right or interest if the trustee gives the custodian:

A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form;

A certified copy of the trust instrument or a certification of the trust under Code Section 53-12-280;

A certification by the trustee, under penalty of perjury, that the trust exists and the trustee is a currently acting trustee of the trust; and

If requested by the custodian:

A number, username, address, or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the trust’s account; or

Evidence linking the account to the trust.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-13-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 1089, § 1/SB 301.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 275 (2018).

53-13-20.
Access to digital assets by conservator.

After an opportunity for a hearing under subsection (b) or (c) of Code Section 29-3-22 or under subsection (b) or (c) of Code Section 29-5-23, the court may grant a conservator access to the digital assets of a protected person.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court or directed by the user, a custodian shall disclose to a conservator the catalogue of electronic communications sent or received by a protected person and any digital assets, other than the content of electronic communications, in which the protected person has a right or interest if the conservator gives the custodian:

A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form;

A certified copy of the court order that gives the conservator authority over the digital assets of the protected person; and

If requested by the custodian:

A number, username, address, or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the account of the protected person; or

Evidence linking the account to the protected person.

A conservator with general authority to manage the assets of a protected person may request that a custodian of the digital assets of the protected person suspend or terminate an account of the protected person for good cause. A request made under this Code section shall be accompanied by a certified copy of the court order giving the conservator authority over the protected person’s property.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-13-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 1089, § 1/SB 301; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 42/HB 70.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, substituted “subsection (b) or (c) of Code Section 29-3-22 or under subsection (b) or (c)” for “paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-3-22 or paragraph (2) of subsection (b)” in the middle of subsection (a).